english1.lexc
					!See section 4.2; lexc stands for Lexicon Compiler

Multichar_Symbols	!Don't include CONTINUATION CLASSES or names of a lexicon
					+N +Sg +Pl 
					+V +3P +Past +PastPart +PresPart
			
LEXICON Root 	!There are many lexicons here; only 1 can be called Root
		Noun;	!Root is meant to suggest the root of a word
		Verb;	!Lexicon names are not followed by semicolon

LEXICON Noun
cat   Ninf;		!Each entry in a lexicon is a FORM and CONTINUATION CLASS
city  Ninf;
fox   Ninf;
panic Ninf;
try   Ninf;
watch Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf
+N+Sg:0 #;		!A CONTINUATION CLASS may be a terminal symbol
+N+Pl:^s #;		!This is a 2-level transducer as shown by the colon

LEXICON Verb
beg   Vinf;
fox   Vinf;
make  Vinf;
panic Vinf;
try   Vinf;
watch Vinf;

LEXICON Vinf
+V:0 #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s #;
+V+Past:^ed #;
+V+PastPart:^ed #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;

END !optional end statement

anything after it is ignored
